Nevada, session 83, SB85.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 484B.830 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
484B.830 1. Not later than January 1, 2022, the Department
shall develop and implement a standardized method to be used by
law enforcement officers to record information concerning traffic
stops in an electronic traffic citation system. The standardized
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
method must require the electronic traffic citation system to provide
for the following information to be recorded for each stop:
(a) The date and time of the stop;
(b) The location of the stop;
(c) The race, ethnicity, age and sex of the person stopped, based
on the observations of the law enforcement officer responsible for
reporting the stop;
(d) The nature of, and the statutory citation for, the alleged
violation that caused the stop to be made; and
(e) The disposition of the stop, including, without limitation,
whether:
(1) A warning, citation or summons was issued;
(2) A search was conducted and, if so:
(I) The type of search conducted; and
(II) Whether anything was found as a result of the search;
and
(3) An arrest was made.
2. Not later than January 1, 2022, the Department, in
consultation with law enforcement agencies, shall develop and
implement training and procedures to facilitate the collection of
information concerning traffic stops for which citations are
issued through an electronic traffic citation system pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. [During the period beginning on January 1, 2022, and
ending on December 31, 2025, each] Each law enforcement officer
that makes a traffic stop for which a citation is issued through an
electronic traffic citation system shall record for each stop the
information set forth in paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive, of
subsection 1, and each law enforcement agency shall retain such
information.
4. [Each] On or before February 1 of each year, each law
enforcement agency that engages in traffic stops for which citations
are issued through an electronic traffic citation system shall report to
the Department the information recorded for the previous calendar
year pursuant to subsection 3 . [not later than February 1, 2023, and
at least annually thereafter until February 1, 2026.]
5. Information acquired pursuant to this section must be used
[by the Department] only for statistical purposes and not for any
other purpose. Any identifying information of a law enforcement
officer who performed a traffic stop or a person who was stopped
that is collected or held by the Department is confidential.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
Sec. 2. NRS 484B.833 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.833 1. Not later than January 1, 2024, the Department
shall develop and implement a standardized method to be used by
law enforcement officers to record information concerning traffic
stops for which written citations or warnings are issued. The
standardized method must require the information set forth in
paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 484B.830 to
be recorded for each stop.
2. Not later than January 1, 2024, the Department, in
consultation with law enforcement agencies, shall:
(a) Develop and implement training and procedures to facilitate
the collection of information set forth in paragraphs (a) to (e),
inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 484B.830 concerning traffic stops
for which written citations or warnings are issued; and
(b) Update written forms for traffic citations to accommodate
the collection of information set forth in paragraphs (a) to (e),
inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 484B.830.
3. [During the period beginning on January 1, 2024, and
ending on December 31, 2025, each] Each law enforcement officer
that makes a traffic stop for which a written citation or warning is
issued shall record for each stop the information set forth in
paragraphs (a) to (e), inclusive, of subsection 1 of NRS 484B.830,
and each law enforcement agency shall retain such information.
4. [Each] On or before February 1 of each year, each law
enforcement agency that engages in traffic stops for which written
citations or warnings are issued shall report to the Department the
information recorded for the previous calendar year pursuant to
subsection 3 . [not later than February 1, 2025, for the 2024 calendar
year and not later than February 1, 2026, for the 2025 calendar
year.]
5. Information acquired pursuant to this section must be used
[by the Department] only for statistical purposes and not for any
other purpose. Any identifying information of a law enforcement
officer who performed a traffic stop or a person who was stopped
that is collected or held by the Department is confidential.
Sec. 2.5. NRS 484B.837 is hereby amended to read as follows:
484B.837 1. To the extent that money is available, the
Department may contract with a third party to review all public
information, including, without limitation, the prevalence and
disposition of traffic stops reported by law enforcement agencies
pursuant to NRS 484B.830 and 484B.833, and conduct a statistical
analysis of the data for the purpose of identifying patterns or
practices of profiling.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 4 –
2. If a third party with whom the Department contracts
pursuant to subsection 1 conducts a statistical analysis, the third
party must, not later than December 31 of the year in which the
statistical analysis is conducted, report the results of the analysis to
the Governor, to the Department [,] and to the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(a) If the report is prepared in an even-numbered year, the
[Chair of the Senate Standing Committee on Judiciary and the Chair
of the Assembly] next regular session of the Legislature.
(b) If the report is prepared in an odd-numbered year, the
Joint Interim Standing Committee on the Judiciary.
3. The Department shall seek any available gifts, grants or
donations to assist in enabling the Department to contract with a
third party pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 3. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 4. The provisions of NRS 218D.380 do not apply to any
provision of this act which adds or revises a requirement to submit a
report to the Legislature.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)